Utah statutes.
17-31-3.   Reserve fund authorized -- Use of collected funds.

The county legislative body may create a reserve fund and any funds collected but not expended during any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the governing bodies but shall be retained in a special fund to be used in accordance with Sections 17-31-2 through 17-31-5.

